nb: Skalamodellmateriale: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Kartong; Metall; Papir; Plast; Polyaktidsyre (PLA); Harpiks; Trevirke; Annet
ja: スケールモデル材料: アクリロニトリルブタジエンスチレン (ABS); カラーペーパー; 金属; 紙; プラスチック; ポリ乳酸 (PLA); レジン; 木材; その他
de: Material für maßstabsgetreue Modelle: Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol (ABS); Kartonpapier; Metall; Papier; Kunststoff; Polylactid (PLA); Harz; Holz; Sonstiges
hu: Méretarányos modell anyaga: Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol (ABS); Kartonpapír; Fém; Papír; Műanyag; Politejsav (PLA); Gyanta; Fa; Egyéb
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำชุดต่อโมเดลจำลอง: อะคริโลไนไตรลบิวตาไดอีนสไตรีน (ABS); กระดาษการ์ด; โลหะ; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; กรดโพลิแลคติก (PLA); เรซิน; ไม้; อื่นๆ
cs: Materiál modelové stavebnice: Akrylonitril butadien styren (ABS); Papíry a čtvrtky; Kov; Papír; Plast; Polymléčná kyselina (PLA); Pryskyřice; Dřevo; Jiné
ro-RO: Material pentru machete: Acrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Carton; Metal; Hârtie; Plastic; Acid polilactic (PLA); Rășină; Lemn; Altele
nl: Materiaal schaalmodel: Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen (ABS); Karton; Metaal; Papier; Plastic; Polymelkzuur (PLA); Hars; Hout; Andere
vi: Vật liệu mô hình: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Giấy bìa; Kim loại; Giấy; Nhựa; Axit polylactic (PLA); Nhựa resin; Gỗ; Khác
es: Material de modelismo: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Cartulina; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Ácido poliláctico (PLA); Resina; Madera; Otros
it: Materiale del modello in scala: Acrilonitrile butadiene stirene (ABS); Cartoncino; Metallo; Carta; Plastica; Acido polilattico (PLA); Resina; Legno; Altro
tr: Maket ölçekli malzeme: Akrilonitril bütadien stiren (ABS); Kalın Kağıt; Metal; Kağıt; Plastik; Polilaktik asit (PLA); Reçine; Ahşap; Diğer
bg-BG: Материал за умален модел: Акрилонитрил-бутадиен-стирол (ABS); Картон; Метал; Хартия; Пластмаса; Полимлечна киселина (PLA); Смола; Дърво; Други
sv: Skalmodell - material: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Papp; Metall; Papper; Plast; Polymjölksyra (PLA); Harts; Trä; Övrigt
fr: Matériel de modélisme: Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène (ABS); Carton; Métal; Papier; Plastique; Acide polylactique (PLA); Résine; Bois; Autre
pt-PT: Material do modelo de balança: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Cartão; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Ácido poliláctico (PLA); Resina; Madeira; Outro
fi: Pienoismallimateriaali: Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni (ABS); Kartonki; Metalli; Paperi; Muovi; Polylmaitohappo (PLA); Hartsi; Puu; Muu
zh-TW: 等比例模型製作材質: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 卡片紙; 金屬; 紙; 塑膠; 聚乳酸 (PLA); 樹脂; 木材; 其他
el: Υλικό μακέτας: Ακρυλονιτρίλιο βουταδιένιο στυρόλιο (ABS); Χαρτόνι; Μέταλλο; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Πολυγαλακτικό οξύ (PLA); Ρητίνη; Ξύλο; Άλλο
pl: Materiał modelu redukcyjnego: Akrylonitryl-butadien-styren (ABS); Brystol; Metal; Papier; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polikwas mlekowy (PLA); Żywica; Drewno; Inne
lt-LT: Modelio medžiaga: Akrilnitrilo butadieno stirenas (ABS); Kartonas; Metalas; Popierius; Plastikas; Polipieno rūgštis (PLA); Derva; Mediena; Kita
sl-SI: Material za maketo: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Šeleshamer; Kovina; Papir; Plastika; Polimlečna kislina (PLA); Smola; Les; Drugo
en: Scale model material: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Cardstock; Metal; Paper; Plastic; Polylactic acid (PLA); Resin; Wood; Other
pt-BR: Material de miniatura: Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno (ABS); Cartolina; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Ácido polilático (PLA); Resina; Madeira; Outro
ru: Материал масштабной модели: Акрилонитрилбутадиенстирол (АБС); Картон; Металл; Бумага; Пластик; Полимолочная кислота (PLA); Смола; Дерево; Другой
zh-CN: 比例模型材质: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 卡片纸; 金属; 纸张; 塑料; 聚乳酸 (PLA); 树脂; 木头; 其他
ko: 축소 모형 자재: 아크릴로니트릴 부타디엔 스티렌(ABS); 마분지; 금속; 종이; 플라스틱; 폴리락틱 산(PLA); 수지; 목재; 기타
da: Skalamodelmateriale: Acrylonitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Karton; Metal; Papir; Plast; Polymælkesyre (PLA); Harpiks; Træ; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal makete: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Tvrdi papir; Metal; Papir; Plastika; Polimliječna kiselina (PLA); Smola; Drvo; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál zmenšeného modelu: Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén (ABS); Kartónový obal; Kov; Papier; Plast; Kyselina polymliečna (PLA); Živica; Drevo; Iné